Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB285.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 132 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) (a) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, real property
owned by and maintained as the permanent residence of a veteran of the
Armed Forces of the United States who meets the qualifications under
paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be provided a homestead exemption
on the assessed valuation of the permanent residence and contiguous real
property in accordance with this section.
(b) In order to qualify for the homestead exemption provided under this section,
the owner shall be a veteran with a fifty percent (50%) or greater service-
connected disability rating adjudicated by the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs.
(c) The homestead exemption amount is equal to the result computed from
multiplying the veteran's service-connected disability rating percentage by:
1. The first one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) of the assessed
valuation of the veteran's permanent residence and contiguous real
property; or
2. The total assessed valuation of the veteran's permanent residence and
contiguous real property when the total assessed valuation is less than
one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(d) If a veteran qualifies for more than one (1) homestead exemption under this
section and KRS 132.810:
1. Only one (1) homestead exemption per residential unit is allowed;
2. The homestead exemptions cannot be combined; and
3. The homestead exemption amount that provides the largest monetary
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 11/21/2025 10:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1191
benefit to the veteran shall be applied to the assessed valuation of the
veteran's permanent residence and contiguous real property.
(e) The permanent residence and contiguous real property of the surviving
spouse of a veteran who qualified for a homestead exemption under this
section prior to his or her death shall continue to qualify for the homestead
exemption as long as:
1. The surviving spouse:
a. Was married to the veteran at the time of the veteran's death;
and
b. Has not remarried since the death of the veteran; and
2. The property:
a. Was the permanent residence of the surviving spouse at the time
of the veteran's death; and
b. Has been maintained as the permanent residence of the
surviving spouse since the veteran's death.
(2) The department shall prescribe forms and an application process for the
homestead exemption provided under this section.
(3) Notwithstanding any statutory provisions to the contrary, the provisions of this
section shall apply to the assessment and taxation of real property for state,
county, city, and special district purposes.
(4) A mobile home, manufactured home, or recreational vehicle, when classified as
real property under KRS 132.751, or a modular home shall qualify as a
permanent residence for purposes of the homestead exemption provided under
this section.
(5) When title to real property that is exempted either in whole or in part under this
section is transferred, the owner, administrator, executor, trustee, guardian,
conservator, curator, or agent shall report the transfer to the property valuation
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 11/21/2025 10:30 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1191
administrator.
(6) The real property may be held by legal or equitable title, by the entireties, jointly,
in common, as a condominium, or indirectly by the stock ownership or
membership representing the owner's or member's proprietary interest in a
corporation owning a fee or a leasehold initially in excess of ninety-eight (98)
years. The homestead exemption provided under this section shall apply only to
the value of the real property assessable to the owner or, in case of ownership
through stock or membership in a corporation, the value of the proportion which
his or her interest in the corporation bears to the assessed value of the property.
(7) Any owner making application and qualifying for the homestead exemption
provided under this section:
(a) Before payment of his or her property taxes for the assessment year in
question shall be entitled to a full or partial exoneration, as the case may be,
of the property tax due to reflect the taxable assessment after allowance for
the homestead exemption; or
(b) After property taxes have been paid for the assessment year in question
shall be entitled to a refund of the taxes paid applicable to the value of the
homestead exemption.
Section 2. This Act applies to property assessed on or after January 1, 2027.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 11/21/2025 10:30 AM Jacketed